test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-vwwrwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - vȭrõz: # adjectives 180 'eng /est võõras/fin' - full paradigm
     vȭrõz+A+Sg+Nom: vȭrõz
     vȭrõz+A+Sg+Gen: vȭrõ
     vȭrõz+A+Sg+Par: vȭrõzt
     vȭrõz+A+Sg+Dat: vȭrõn
     vȭrõz+A+Sg+Ins: vȭrõks
     vȭrõz+A+Sg+Ill: [vȭrõ, vȭrõz]
     vȭrõz+A+Sg+Ela: vȭrõst
     vȭrõz+A+Pl+Nom: vȭrõd
     vȭrõz+A+Pl+Gen: vȭrõd
     vȭrõz+A+Pl+Par: vȭridi
     vȭrõz+A+Pl+Dat: vȭrõdõn
     vȭrõz+A+Pl+Ins: vȭrõdõks
     vȭrõz+A+Pl+Ill: vȭriž
     vȭrõz+A+Pl+Ela: vȭrist
